Hawaii, session 2025, GM1358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the search for a new
landfill for the city and county of Honolulu cannot be
prioritized over the protection of Oahu's freshwater aquifers.
In 2021, approximately twenty thousand gallons of jet fuel
leaked from the Red Hill bulk fuel storage facility and
contaminated the Pearl Harbor-Hickam water system that serves
ninety-three thousand military and civilian customers. The leak
also affected the Honolulu board of water supply, and the city
and county has shut down three wells that supply fourteen
million gallons of water a day to urban Honolulu. The Honolulu
board of water supply is in search of new wells that can supply
urban Honolulu, which may not be ready until 2025. To protect
and preserve freshwater, a new landfill cannot be built inland
of underground injection control lines.
The legislature further finds that prime agricultural land
should be protected, preserved, and reserved for agricultural
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO
■IIBIHinillH

Page 2 H.B. NO. "

C.D. 1
and related uses. Therefore, a new landfill should not be
located on those agricultural lands.
The legislature also finds that the city and county of
Honolulu is required to relocate the Waimanalo Gulch sanitary
landfill by 2028. The department of environmental services of
the city and county of Honolulu proposed six potential sites
upon which to relocate the landfill, and all sites were rejected
by the landfill advisory committee because of concerns that
locating a landfill above freshwater aquifers may damage the
State's water sources. Section 183C-4 (b), Hawaii Revised
Statutes, prohibits waste or disposal facilities in a
conservation district, except in emergency circumstances where
it may be necessary to mitigate significant risks to public
health and safety. Furthermore, section 342H-52 (b), Hawaii
Revised Statutes, prohibits the construction, modification, or
expansion of a waste or disposal facility within a one-half mile
buffer zone between the edge of the waste or waste activity and
the nearest residential, school, or hospital property line.
The purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Prohibit landfill units on land in an agricultural
district having soil classified by the land study
2025-3430 HB969 GDI HMSO
ininiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 3 H.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
bureau's detailed land classification as overall
(master) productivity rating class A in a county with
a population greater than five hundred thousand;
(2) Beginning July 1, 2025, narrow the existing
prohibition on the construction, modification, or
expansion of waste or disposal facilities within a
one-half mile buffer zone of residential, school, or
hospital property lines to apply specifically to
landfill units or components of landfill units; and
(3) Beginning July 1, 2025, prohibit the construction,
modification, or expansion of a landfill unit, or any
component of a landfill unit, inland of an underground
injection control line in a county with a population
greater than five hundred thousand, with certain
exemptions.
SECTION 2. Section 205-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows:
"(d) Agricultural districts shall include:
(1) Activities or uses as characterized by the cultivation
of crops, crops for bioenergy, orchards, forage, and
forestry;
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO
■nMiiiiiiiiimimiii

Page 4 S
H.B. NO. i
C.D. 1
(2) Farming activities or uses- related to animal husbandry
and game and fish propagation;
(3) Aquaculture, which means the production of aquatic
plant and animal life within ponds and other bodies of
water;
(4) Wind-generated energy production for public, private,
and commercial use;
(5) Biofuel production, as described in
section 205-4.5 (a) (16), for public, private, and
commercial use;
(6) Solar energy facilities; provided that:
(A) This paragraph shall apply only to land with soil
classified by the land study bureau's detailed
land classification as overall (master)
productivity rating class B, C, D, or E; and
(B) Solar energy facilities placed within land with
soil classified as overall productivity rating
class B or C shall not occupy more than ten per
cent of the acreage of the parcel, or twenty
acres of land, whichever is lesser, unless a
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO
IlilillHHIMIIIIM

Page 5 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
special use permit is granted pursuant to
section 205-6;
(7) Bona fide agricultural services and uses that support
the agricultural activities of the fee or leasehold
owner of the property and accessory to any of the
above activities, regardless of whether conducted on
the same premises as the agricultural activities to
which they are accessory, including farm dwellings as
defined in section 205-4.5 (a) (4), employee housing,
farm buildings, mills, storage facilities, processing
facilities, photovoltaic, biogas, and other
small-scale renewable energy systems producing energy
solely for use in the agricultural activities of the
fee or leasehold owner of the property,
agricultural-energy facilities as defined in
section 205-4.5 (a) (17), vehicle and equipment storage
areas, and plantation community subdivisions as
defined in section 205-4.5 (a) (12);
(8) Wind machines and wind farms;
(9) Small-scale meteorological, air quality, noise, and
other scientific and environmental data collection and
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO 5

Page 6 H.B. NO. h S.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
monitoring facilities occupying less than one-half
acre of land; provided that these facilities shall not
be used as or equipped for use as living quarters or
dwellings;
(10) Agricultural parks;
(11) Agricultural tourism conducted on a working farm, or a
farming operation as defined in section 165-2, for the
enjoyment, education, or involvement of visitors;
provided that the agricultural tourism activity is
accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural
use and does not interfere with surrounding farm
operations; [aad] provided further that this paragraph
shall apply only to a county that has adopted
ordinances regulating agricultural tourism under
section 205-5;
(12) Agricultural tourism activities, including overnight
accommodations of twenty-one days or less, for any one
stay within a county; provided that this paragraph
shall apply only to a county that includes at least
three islands and has adopted ordinances regulating
agricultural tourism activities pursuant to
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO 6
iiiiiiiiiniiiiiiiniiiiiiiiii

Page 7 H.B. NO 969
H.D. 2
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
section 205-5; provided further that the agricultural
tourism activities coexist with a bona fide
agricultural activity. For the purposes of this
paragraph, "bona fide agricultural activity" means a
farming operation as defined in section 165-2;
(13) Open area recreational facilities;
(14) Geothermal resources exploration and geothermal
resources development, as defined under section 182-1;
(15) Agricultural-based commercial operations registered in
Hawaii, including:
(A) A roadside stand that is not an enclosed
structure, owned and operated by a producer for
the display and sale of agricultural products
grown in Hawaii and value-added products that
were produced using agricultural products grown
in Hawaii;
(B) Retail activities in an enclosed structure owned
and operated by a producer for the display and
sale of agricultural products grown in Hawaii,
value-added products that were produced using
agricultural products grown in Hawaii, logo items
2025-3430 HB969 GDI HMSO

Page 8
H.B. NO. S-i
C.D. 1
related to the producer's agricultural
operations, and other food items;
(C) A retail food establishment owned and operated by
a producer and permitted under chapter 11-50,
Hawaii administrative rules, that prepares and
serves food at retail using products grown in
Hawaii and value-added products that were
produced using agricultural products grown in
Hawaii;
(D) A farmers' market, which is an outdoor market
limited to producers selling agricultural
products grown in Hawaii and value-added products
that were produced using agricultural products
grown in Hawaii; and
(E) A food hub, which is a facility that may contain
a commercial kitchen and provides for the
storage, processing, distribution, and sale of
agricultural products grown in Hawaii and
value-added products that were produced using
agricultural products grown in Hawaii.
2025-3430 HB969 GDI HMSO 8

Page 9 H.B. NO. h |2
C.D. 1
The owner of an agricultural-based coramercial
operation shall certify, upon request of an officer or
agent charged with enforcement of this chapter under
section 205-12, that the agricultural products
displayed or sold by the operation meet the
requirements of this paragraph;
(16) Hydroelectric facilities as described in
section 205-4.5 (a) (23); and
(17) Composting and co-composting operations; provided that
operations that process their own green waste and do
not require permits from the department of health
shall use the finished composting product only on the
operation's own premises to minimize the potential
spread of invasive species.
Agricultural districts shall not include golf courses and golf
driving ranges, except as provided in section 205-4.5(d). No
landfill unit, as defined in section 342H-52, shall be located
on land within the agricultural district that has soil
classified by the land study bureau's detailed land
classification as overall (master) productivity rating class A
in a county with a population greater than five hundred
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO
iniiiiiiMiiiuiinHH

Page 10 H.B. NO. S i
C.D. 1
thousand. Agricultural districts include areas that are not
used for, or that are not suited to, agricultural and ancillary-
activities by reason of topography, soils, and other related
characteristics."
SECTION 3. Section 205-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
" (b) Uses not expressly permitted in subsection (a)^.
including landfill units, as defined in section 342H-52, located
on land within the agricultural district that has soil
classified by the land study bureau's detailed land
classification as overall (master) productivity rating class A
in a county with a population greater than five hundred
thousand, shall be prohibited, except the uses permitted as
provided in sections 205-6 and 205-8, and construction of
single-family dwellings on lots existing before June 4, 1976.
Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, no subdivision of
land within the agricultural district with soil classified by
the land study bureau’s detailed land classification as overall
(master) productivity rating class A or B shall be approved by a
county unless those A and B lands within the subdivision are
made subject to the restriction on uses as prescribed in this
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO 1
IIMIIillllilOIIIIIIIIIHill

Page 11
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
section and to the condition that the uses shall be primarily in
pursuit of an agricultural activity.
Any deed, lease, agreement of sale, mortgage, or other
instrument of conveyance covering any land within the
agricultural subdivision shall expressly contain the restriction
on uses and the condition, as prescribed in this section^ that
these restrictions and conditions shall be encumbrances running
with the land until [such time that] the land is reclassified to
a land use district other than an agricultural district.
If the foregoing requirement of encumbrances running with
the land jeopardizes the owner or lessee in obtaining mortgage
financing from any of the mortgage lending agencies set forth in
the following paragraph, and the requirement is the sole reason
for failure to obtain mortgage financing, then the requirement
of encumbrances shall, insofar as [sueh] the mortgage financing
is jeopardized, be conditionally waived by the appropriate
county enforcement officer; provided that the conditional waiver
shall become effective only in the event that the property is
subjected to foreclosure proceedings by the mortgage lender.
The mortgage lending agencies referred to in the preceding
paragraph are the Federal Housing Administration, Federal
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO 1
iiiiniiiioiiniiiiiniii

Page 12
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
National Mortgage Association, Department of Veterans Affairs,
Small Business Administration, United States Department of
Agriculture, Federal Land Bank of Berkeley, Federal Intermediate
Credit Bank of Berkeley, Berkeley Bank for Cooperatives, and any
other federal, state, or private mortgage lending agency
qualified to do business in Hawaii, and their respective
successors and assigns."
SECTION 4. Section 342H-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§342H-52 Prohibitions; buffer zones. (a) No person,
including any federal agency, the State, or any county, shall
construct, operate, modify, expand, or close a municipal solid
waste landfill unit, or any component of a municipal solid waste
landfill unit, without first obtaining a permit from the
director. All permits for municipal solid waste landfill units
shall be subject to any terms and conditions that the director
determines are necessary to protect human health or the
environment.
(b) [N©] Beginning July 1, 2025, no person, including the
State or any county, shall construct, modify, or expand a [wa©fee
or diopos-al --facility including a municipal sel-id—wast-o land-fill
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO 12

Page 13 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
unit/—any oomponont of a municipal solid waste landfill unit,—a
e&n-struction and demolition landfill unit,—oi^-any—eompenent—of—a
eon-st-ruction and demolition] landfill unit or component of a
landfill unit without first establishing a buffer zone of no
less than one-half mile around the [waste or dispersal facility.]
landfill unit or component of a landfill unit. This subsection
shall not apply to the continued operation of an existing [waste
or disposal facility] landfill unit or component of a landfill
unit that is properly permitted; provided that continued
operation does not require physical expansion, vertical or
horizontal, of the [facility] landfill unit or component of a
landfill unit requiring additional permitting review and a
permit modification.
[For the purposes of this subsection:
meafis—fefie—diefaftee-^efween-^the—edge—ef—waefe
er-wa£rte activity and the 'noarosf-ge&fdentia-l/—schoo-l,—er"
hospital property line.
"Waste or disposal facility" excl-udes individual/—state
certified/—non-industrial redemption' centers.]
(c) Beginning July 1, 2025, no person, including the State
or any county, shall construct, modify, or expand a landfill
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO 13
inniHiiHiffliiiiiiiiR

Page 14
H-B. NO.
C.D. 1
unit or any component of a landfill unit inland of an
underground injection control line in a county with a population
greater than five hundred thousand. This subsection shall not
apply to the continued operation of an existing landfill unit or
any component of a landfill unit that is properly permitted;
provided that continued operation does not require physical
expansion, vertical or horizontal, of the landfill unit or
component of a landfill unit requiring additional permitting
review and a permit modification.
(d) For the purposes of this section:
"Buffer zone" means the distance between the edge of the
landfill unit or component of the landfill unit and the nearest
residential, school, or hospital property line.
"Landfill unit" means a municipal solid waste landfill unit
or a construction and demolition landfill unit.
"Underground injection control line" means the line
determined by the department under rules adopted or regulations
promulgated pursuant to section 340E-2."
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-3430 HB969 CDl HMSO 14
liiiiiiiiiiiMimiiii

Page 15
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3430 HB969 GDI HMSO


H.B. NO 969
H.
S.
C.
Q
Q
Q
(N
CM
APPROVED this 1st day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 969, HD 2, SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 969, H.D. 2, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
227